Massachusetts, session 194th, H3504.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 25A of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 21. GREEN Act.
(a) As used in this section the following words shall have the following meanings unless
the context clearly requires otherwise:-
“Clean cooking technology,” a non-combustion technology used to prepare food without
emitting greenhouse gasses or other harmful pollutants in normal operation, such as induction or
radiant electric stoves.
of 6

“Clean heating technology,” a non-combustion technology used to provide space heating
and cooling or water heating and cooling without emitting greenhouse gasses or other harmful
pollutants in normal operation, such as air-source heat pumps, ground-source heat pumps, and
solar hot water systems.
“Department,” the department of energy resources.
“Gateway municipality,” as defined in section 3A of chapter 23A.
“Highly energy efficient,” using efficient appliances and lighting and plumbing fixtures,
with a building envelope that meets passive house standards or as close to passive house
standards as practicable given the constraints of the building.
“Initiative,” the Gateway Cities Renewable, Efficient, and Electrified Neighborhoods
Initiative, known as the GREEN Initiative.
“Low income,” earning below 50 per cent of area median income.
“Moderate income,” earning between 50 to 80 per cent of area median income.
“Passive house standards,” standards for the construction of highly energy efficient
buildings, including but not limited to: (a) continuous insulation throughout the entire building
envelope without any thermal bridging; (b) an extremely airtight building envelope, preventing
infiltration of outside air and loss of conditioned air; (c) high-performance windows and doors
that exploit the sun's energy for heating purposes in the heating season and minimize overheating
during the cooling season; (d) balanced heat- and moisture-recovery ventilation; and (e) a
minimal space conditioning system.
“Qualifying municipality,” a gateway municipality or smaller qualifying municipality.
of 6

“Renewable electricity,” electricity produced by a renewable energy generating source.
“Renewable energy generating source,” as defined in section 11F of chapter 25A.
“Smaller qualifying municipality,” a municipality that meets all of the criteria to be a
gateway municipality except that its population is 35,000 or less.
“Tenant-owner weatherization agreements” enforceable agreements between residential
tenants and a building owner clearly stating that, for a reasonable period of time after a retrofit
has been completed, the tenants (including households paying for their energy through their rent)
will not be subjected to rent increases unless those increases are demonstrably related to matters
other than the weatherization work performed.
(b) There shall be a Gateway Cities Renewable, Efficient, and Electrified Neighborhoods
Initiative, known as the GREEN Initiative, within the department. The department may contract
with the Massachusetts Clean Energy Center to administer all or part of the GREEN Initiative.
The purpose of the GREEN Initiative is to retrofit existing low income and moderate income
housing in qualifying municipalities to be highly energy efficient, use only clean heating
technologies and clean cooking technologies, and where possible be powered by electricity from
on-site renewable energy generating sources. The initiative shall collect data and identify best
practices for retrofitting Massachusetts’ existing low income and moderate income housing
stock.
(c) There shall be established a GREEN Initiative Account within the department. Each
year, electric and gas distribution companies and municipal aggregators with certified clean
energy plans shall transfer a sum of money into the GREEN Initiative Account sufficient to
administer the initiative, collect and analyze data, and provide incentives, rebates, or other
of 6

financial assistance necessary to complete the retrofits beyond the financial assistance already
available from ratepayer-funded energy efficiency programs or other utility, state or federal
programs; provided, that the sum of money transferred to the department in any year shall not
exceed $30 million. The department of public utilities may adjust the charges assessed to electric
and gas utility customers under sections 19 and 21 of chapter 25 to ensure that there are
sufficient resources to meet the objectives of the energy efficiency investment plan and natural
gas efficiency investment plan. The department may accept funds into the GREEN Initiative
Account from other sources, including grants from foundations, individual donors, and state and
federal agencies, without annual limits.
(d) Municipal governments, nonprofit organizations, or other entities, known as sponsor
organizations, shall apply to the department to carry out a project in one or more qualifying
municipalities. Each project shall retrofit low income or moderate income housing units, in one
or more buildings, to be highly energy efficient, use only clean heating technologies and clean
cooking technologies, and where possible be powered by electricity from on-site renewable
energy generating sources. If a residential building includes commercial space, the project may
also retrofit the commercial space within the building. Each project may include housing owned
by a municipality or other government entity, subsidized affordable housing owned by a
nonprofit or for-profit corporation, or non-subsidized housing that is typically occupied by low
income or moderate income individuals.
(e) In administering this program, the department shall prioritize retrofits of buildings
with 6 or fewer housing units, including buildings occupied by owners and buildings occupied
by tenants.
of 6

(f) The department shall assist sponsor organizations in assessing technology options and
identifying qualified contractors to carry out the retrofits. The department shall work with the
department of public utilities and other state agencies to provide a single application process for
sponsor organizations, building owners, and tenants to qualify for all applicable energy
efficiency, clean heating, clean cooking, and renewable electricity financial assistance programs
offered by the commonwealth, electric and gas distribution companies, and municipal
aggregators with certified clean energy plans, and for additional incentives offered by the
department through the initiative. The department shall develop incentive structures that
encourage property owners to maintain their properties as low income or moderate income
housing for several years after retrofits are completed. Such incentives may include tenant-owner
weatherization agreements.
(g) The department shall set goals for the participation of contractors that are minority
business enterprises and women business enterprises in projects funded by the initiative.
(h) The department may cover the costs of pre-weatherization, electrical service
upgrades, or other improvements necessary before energy efficiency, clean heating, clean
cooking, and renewable electricity upgrades can be completed.
(i) Each sponsor organization shall hold at least one event open to the general public to
share the results of the project, and shall make an effort to publicize the results of the project to
local news outlets and on social media. Each sponsor organization shall make information about
the project available online in the predominant languages spoken in the community, and shall
provide interpretation services at the event for non-English speakers. The department shall
of 6

provide financial assistance for sponsor organizations to pay for interpretation and translation
services.
(j) The department shall collect quantitative and qualitative data on the results of the
initiative, and publish evaluations no later than 1 year after the end of the second year and every
two years thereafter. The evaluations shall consider data on energy savings, utility bill savings,
improvements in indoor and outdoor air quality, reductions in greenhouse gas emissions and
100 other pollutants, and improvements in comfort and safety for residents, and identify the most
101 effective retrofit approaches for each housing type. The department shall use appropriate
102 practices to prevent the public disclosure of personally identifying information regarding owners
103 and tenants. The evaluations shall also include data on the participation of contractors that are
104 minority business enterprises and women business enterprises in projects funded by the
105 initiative.
106 (k) The department shall convene a task force to advise the department on the
107 implementation of this section, including individuals representing the executive office of energy
108 and environmental affairs, department of energy resources, department of public utilities,
109 department of environmental protection, Massachusetts Clean Energy Center, department of
110 housing and community development, executive office of labor and workforce development, and
111 department of public health. The task force shall also include at least 2 low income or moderate
112 income residents of qualifying municipalities, and at least 2 representatives of nonprofit
113 organizations headquartered in or with a significant presence in qualifying municipalities. The
114 task force shall hold at least 4 public hearings in qualifying municipalities in the first year after
115 the effective date of this section, and at least 2 public hearings in qualifying municipalities in
116 each subsequent year.
of 6